Utah statutes.
53C-1-303.   Responsibilities of director -- Budget review -- Legal counsel
-- Contract for services.
(1)  In carrying out the policies of the board of trustees and in establishing
procedures and rules the director shall:
(a)  take an oath of office before assuming any duties as the director;
(b)  adopt procedures and rules necessary for the proper administration of
matters entrusted to the director by state law and board policy;
(c)  submit to the board for its review and concurrence on any rules necessary
for the proper management of matters entrusted to the administration;
(d)  faithfully manage the administration under the policies established by
the board;
(e)  submit to the board and for public inspection by October 1 of each year,
an annual management budget and financial plan for operations of the
administration and, after approval by the board, submit the budget to the
governor;
(f)  direct and control the budget expenditures as finally authorized and
appropriated;
(g)  establish job descriptions and employ, within the limitation of the
budget, staff necessary to accomplish the purposes of the office subject to
Section 53C-1-201;
(h)  establish, in accordance with generally accepted principles of fund
accounting, a system to identify and account for the assets and vested
interests of each beneficiary;
(i)  maintain appropriate records of trust activities to enable auditors
appointed by appropriate state agencies or the board to conduct periodic
audits of trust activities;
(j)  provide that all leases, contracts, and agreements be submitted to legal
counsel for review of compliance with applicable law and fiduciary duties
prior to execution and utilize the services of the attorney general as
provided in Section 53C-1-305;
(k)  keep the board, beneficiaries, governor, Legislature, and the public
informed about the work of the director and administration by reporting to the
board in a public meeting at least once during each calendar quarter; and
(l)  respond in writing within a reasonable time to a request by the board for
responses to questions on policies and practices affecting the management of
the trust.
(2)  Procedures and rules adopted by the Division of State Lands and Forestry
as they relate to trust lands prior to the effective date of this act remain
in effect until amended or repealed by the director.
(3)  The administration shall be the named party in substitution of the
Division of State Lands and Forestry or its predecessor agencies, with respect
to all documents affecting trust lands from the effective date of this act.
(4)  The director may:
(a)  with the consent of the state risk manager and the board, manage lands or
interests in lands held by any other public or private party pursuant to
policies established by the board and may make rules to implement these board
policies;
(b)  sue or be sued as the director of school and institutional trust lands;
(c)  contract with other public agencies for personnel management services;
(d)  contract with any public or private entity to make improvements to or
upon trust lands and to carry out any of the responsibilities of the office,
so long as the contract requires strict adherence to trust management
principles, applicable law and regulation, and is subject to immediate
suspension or termination for cause; and
(e)  with the approval of the board enter into joint ventures and other
business arrangements consistent with the purposes of the trust.
(5)  Any application or bid required for the lease, permitting, or sale of
lands in a competitive process or any request for review pursuant to Section
53C-1-304 shall be considered filed or made on the date received by the
appropriate administrative office, whether transmitted by United States mail
or in any other manner.
